Maryland, session 2025, SB0519.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 55. PROSTATE CANCER CARE ACCESS GRANT PROGRAM.
13–5501.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “FUND” MEANS THE PROSTATE CANCER CARE ACCESS GRANT
PROGRAM FUND.
(C) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE PROSTATE CANCER CARE ACCESS GRANT
PROGRAM.
13–5502.
(A) THERE IS A PROSTATE CANCER CARE ACCESS GRANT PROGRAM.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO IMPROVE
AWARENESS OF AND ACCESS TO PROSTATE CANCER CARE SERVICES FOR
INDIVIDUALS IN THE STATE.
(C) THE SECRETARY SHALL PROVIDE GRANTS TO SUPPORT:
(1) ENTITIES AND PROSTATE CANCER CARE PROVIDERS TO
INCREASE THE GENERAL PUBLIC’S KNOWLEDGE AND AWARENESS OF PROSTATE
CANCER;
(2) TRAVEL AND RELATED COSTS FOR INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE
UNABLE TO ACCESS PROSTATE CANCER CARE IN THEIR OWN COMMUNITIES; AND
(3) ANY OTHER INITIATIVE TO IMPROVE ACCESS TO PROSTATE
CANCER CARE AS DETERMINED BY THE SECRETARY IN CONSULTATION WITH
ORGANIZATIONS THAT HAVE A FOCUS ON INCREASING ACCESS TO CULTURALLY
COMPETENT PROSTATE CANCER CARE.
13–5503.

SENATE BILL 519 3
(A) THERE IS A PROSTATE CANCER CARE ACCESS GRANT PROGRAM FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE GRANTS UNDER THE
PROGRAM.
(C) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(2) INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND; AND
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR THE PROGRAM.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(H) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
13–5504.
(A) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2025, THE GOVERNOR SHALL ALLOCATE BY
BUDGET AMENDMENT AT LEAST $100,000 OF THE FUND FOR THE PROGRAM FOR
FISCAL YEAR 2026.
(B) FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 AND 2028, THE GOVERNOR SHALL
INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $100,000 FOR THE
PROGRAM.

SENATE BILL 519
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
[and]
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund; AND
206. THE PROSTATE CANCER CARE ACCESS GRANT
PROGRAM FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.